Utah statutes.
78A-6-202.   Sessions of juvenile court.

(1)  In each county, regular juvenile court sessions shall be held at a place designated by the judge or judges of the juvenile court district, with the approval of the board.

(2)  Court sessions shall be held in each county when the presiding judge of the juvenile court directs, except that a judge of the district may hold court in any county within the district at any time, if required by the urgency of the case.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

